apertium-ita.ita.dix
<pardef n="astra/rre__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>rremmo</l>    <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rrei</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rreste</l>    <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rresti</l>    <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rrebber</l>   <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rrebbero</l>  <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rrebbe</l>    <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rremo</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rrò</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rrete</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rrai</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rran</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rranno</l>    <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rrà</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endo</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endo</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emmo</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssi</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esti</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sser</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssero</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sse</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iamo</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iamo</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantiamo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggan</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggano</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gga</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rr</l>        <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rre</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evamo</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evo</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evate</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evi</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>evan</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>evano</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eva</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essimo</l>    <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essi</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essi</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esser</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essero</l>    <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esse</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantate"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tta</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tta</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantata"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tti</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tti</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantati"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tto</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tto</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantato"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iamo</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggo</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggon</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggono</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iamo</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gga</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iate</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gga</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ggan</l>      <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ggano</l>     <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gga</l>       <r>rre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  

<e lm="astrarre">        <i>astra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="attrarre">        <i>attra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contrarre">       <i>contra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="detrarre">        <i>detra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distrarre">       <i>distra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="estrarre">        <i>estra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="protrarre">       <i>protra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rattrarre">       <i>rattra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ritrarre">        <i>ritra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sottrarre">       <i>sottra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trarre">          <i>tra</i><par n="astra/rre__vblex"/></e>
